Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4740
Hearing loss educational information.

(1) Every birthing facility shall educate the parents of newborns born in such facilities of the importance of receiving a hearing screening test and any necessary followup care. This educational information shall explain, in lay terms, the hearing screening test, the likelihood of the newborn having a hearing loss, followup procedures, and community resources, including referral for early intervention services under the Early Intervention Act. The educational information shall also include a description of the normal auditory, speech, and language developmental process in children. Education shall not be considered a substitute for the hearing screening test.

(2) If a newborn is not born in a birthing facility, the Department of Health and Human Services shall educate the parents of such newborns of the importance of receiving a hearing screening test and any necessary followup care. The department shall also give parents information to assist them in having the test performed within three months after the date of the child's birth.

Laws 2000, LB 950, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 47;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 594.

Early Intervention Act, see section 43-2501.